District of Columbia statutes.
3-1204.10

Disposition of funds.

All fees, civil fines, and other funds collected pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited to the General Fund of the District.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 410, 33 DCR 729

History

1981 Ed., § 2-3304.10.

Prior Codifications